Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Powers and Duties.

Sec. 44.25.010.
Commissioner of revenue.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Revenue is the commissioner of revenue.

History.

(§ 10 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 1 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 9, 17, 18

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories and Dependencies, §§ 61, 64, 76.

81A C.J.S. States, §§ 157 to 174, 245 to 248.

Sec. 44.25.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Revenue shall

enforce the tax laws of the state;

collect, account for, have custody of, invest, and manage all state funds and all revenues of the state except revenues incidental to a program of licensing and regulation carried on by another state department, funds managed and invested by the Alaska Retirement Management Board, and as otherwise provided by law;

invest and manage the balance of the power development fund in accordance with AS

44.83.386

;

administer the surety bond program for licensure as a fish processor or primary fish buyer.

History.

(§ 10 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1961; am § 15 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 60 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 18 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 12 ch 118 SLA 1981; am E.O. No. 73 § 13 (1989); am § 22 ch 31 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 85 § 2 (1993); am § 2 ch 41 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 110, § 8 (2003); am § 11 ch 36 SLA 2004; am § 128 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, the paragraphs of this section were renumbered to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (4).

Administrative Code. —

For application of tax, see 15 AAC 21, art. 1.

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

For licensing, see 15 AAC 116, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 6, 2014, deleted (3), which read “register cattle brands;”, and made related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 146, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, the 2005 amendment to paragraph (2) of this section made by ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, is retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Sec. 44.25.028.
Conflicts of interest and required disclosures when duties relate to pension investments.

The commissioner of revenue may designate employees of the Department of Revenue who are subject to the provisions of AS 39.50 because of their responsibility for participating in the management or investment of the funds for which the Alaska Retirement Management Board is responsible.

If an officer or employee of the Department of Revenue with responsibility for funds for which the Alaska Retirement Management Board is responsible acquires, owns, or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in an entity or project in which assets under the control of the board are invested, the officer or employee shall immediately disclose the interest to the board. The disclosure is a matter of public record and shall be included in the minutes of the board meeting next following the disclosure. The commissioner shall adopt regulations to restrict officers and employees of the department from having a substantial interest in an entity or project in which assets under the control of the board are invested.

Failure to comply with the requirements of this section or regulations enacted under it is grounds for termination of employment.

History.

(§ 23 ch 31 SLA 1992; am §§ 129, 130 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 146,
ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, the 2005 amendments to (a) and (b) of this section made by
ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, are retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Secs. 44.25.030 — 44.25.038.
Loans for Native corporations. [Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]